Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
In General

§ 49-5-1.
Public lands.

All lands belonging to the State of Mississippi whether held in fee or in trust by the state, are hereby declared forest reserves and wild life refuges so long as the state so owns them, and no wild life shall be taken thereon except under regulations of the commission.

Every public park, golf course and play ground, containing as much as fifty (50) acres, shall constitute, and is hereby declared to be a sanctuary or preserve for the protection and propagation of bird and animal life.

The Secretary of State, by and with the consent and approval of the Attorney General and the commission, is hereby authorized and empowered to lease, for a term not exceeding twenty (20) years, the cut-over, swamp and overflowed lands belonging to the state and unsuitable for cultivation, for the purpose of establishing game and fish preserves, but the lease of such land for game preserve purposes shall not be applied to tracts of land of less than one thousand (1,000) acres of contiguous lands.

Such a lease shall provide that the lessee or lessees of the cut-over, swamp or overflowed land shall not cut any timber for commercial purposes or permit waste thereof or of the lands and shall not include the right to mine the oil, gas and minerals on or under the said land. As a consideration for the lease, the Secretary of State, by and with the consent of the Attorney General and the commission, shall contract that the lessee or lessees shall at all times protect the state’s interest in and to the timber growing on the leased lands.

However, nothing in this subsection shall prevent the state from selling at any time any timber or any of said lands so leased, or leasing and/or drilling such lands for gas, oil, and/or minerals.

Furthermore, nothing in this subsection shall prevent the homesteading of any lands so leased.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3879; 1942, §§ 5835, 5860, 5923; Laws, 1924, ch. 323; Laws, 1932, chs. 123, 130; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-2.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-3.
Boards of supervisors may add to preserve.

The board of supervisors of any county may add additional territory to any bird and game preserve or sanctuary by an order entered on their minutes defining the boundaries of the same, and such additional territory shall be subject to all the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3883; 1942, § 5839; Laws, 1924, ch. 323.

§ 49-5-5.
Unlawful to hunt on preserve.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt with gun or dog on any sanctuary or preserve for bird and game, or to rob or destroy the nests of any birds, or to catch, snare, trap, or net any birds within any such prescribed limits, and any person, found with gun or dog on or within such prescribed limits, shall be prima facie presumed to be hunting in violation of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3880; 1942, § 5836; Laws, 1924, ch. 323.

§ 49-5-7.
What birds protected.

No wild bird other than a game bird or introduced pheasants which are hereby classified as domestic fowl shall be pursued, taken, wounded, killed, captured, possessed or exported at any time, dead or alive. No part of the plumage, skin or body of any bird protected by this section or of any birds coming from without the state, the importation of which is prohibited into the United States, shall be sold or had in possession for sale in this state.

No person shall molest, take or destroy or attempt to molest, take or destroy the nests or eggs of any wild bird, or have such nests or eggs in his possession, except under the authority of a permit duly issued for scientific purposes.

This section shall not apply to game birds for which there is an open season under state law or introduced pheasants; birds, or parts thereof collected or possessed under the authority of a certificate duly issued for scientific purposes; or to the English sparrow (Passer domesticus), red-winged blackbird (Agelaius phoeniceus), rusty blackbird (Euphagus carolinus), Brewer’s blackbird (Euphagus cyanocephalus), grackles (Quiscalus sp.), brown-headed cowbird (Molothrus ater), European starling (Sturnus vulgaris) or crows (Corvus sp.) or to the nests or eggs of such unprotected birds. Nor shall anything contained in this section prohibit any person on his own land or land under his control from killing or controlling any English sparrow (Passer domesticus), red-winged blackbird (Agelaius phoeniceus), rusty blackbird (Euphagus carolinus), Brewer’s blackbird (Euphagus cyanocephalus), grackles (Quiscalus sp.), brown-headed cowbird (Molothrus ater), European starling (Sturnus vulgaris) or crows (Corvus sp.) or any bird by nature destructive of gardens, crops or property of any kind when such birds are committing or about to commit depredation upon ornamental or shade trees, agricultural crops, livestock, or wildlife or when concentrated in such numbers and manner as to constitute a health hazard or other nuisance. This section does not authorize and shall not be construed to authorize the killing of any migratory birds protected by the Migratory Bird Treaty Act.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3882; 1942, §§ 5838, 5868, 5869; Laws, 1924, ch. 323; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1948, ch. 252, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 284, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 368, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 553, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 7, 2001.).

§ 49-5-9.
Waterfowl included within term “game.”

As used in Sections 49-5-11 to 49-5-19, the term “game” shall also include waterfowl.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5844-25; Laws, 1962, ch. 181, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 49-5-11.
Game and fish management projects or refuges; purchase of lands.

In addition to the powers and duties now conferred upon the commission, the commission may, in its discretion, purchase by negotiation, contract by option to purchase, provided the option is exercised within a period of ten (10) years from the time executed, the land necessary and requisite for the construction and maintenance of game and fish management projects or game and fish hunting and fishing refuge.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5844; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1946, ch. 423, § 3; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex Sess ch. 41; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 215; Laws, 1954, ch. 175, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 148; Laws, 1958, ch. 176; Laws, 1962, ch. 181, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 261, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 279, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 378, § 1 (s); Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-13.
Wildlife management projects or refuges; regulation and management; lease of lands.

The commission may adopt rules and regulations regulating public hunting and fishing in any wildlife conservation management projects or wildlife conservation hunting and fishing refuges constructed under this chapter, and may prescribe and collect fees for the privilege of hunting and fishing in such projects and shall have general authority to operate such wildlife conservation management areas or refuges.

The commission may adopt such rules and regulations that may be necessary for the management and control of such wildlife conservation management areas or refuges.

The Department of Finance and Administration may lease any lands other than woodlands owned by the state within wildlife conservation management areas as long as such lands are not within the boundaries of the used portions of such areas and so long as such lands are leased as provided for in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. The rental from any such lease is to be paid to the commission and expended as hereinafter provided.

The commission shall recommend to the Department of Finance and Administration the number of acres of land within wildlife conservation management areas which should be leased to private entities. The Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to lease for agricultural purposes that land so recommended for not less than one (1) nor more than five (5) years. The Department of Finance and Administration shall lease the lands for cash rent only. The Department of Finance and Administration shall reserve and exclude from any such lands the hunting rights on the lands at all times after the crops are harvested and until the lands are again planted.

It shall be the duty of the Department of Finance and Administration to lease such lands at public contract upon the submission of two (2) or more sealed bids to the Department of Finance and Administration after having advertised such land for rent in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the land is located, or if no newspaper be published in said county, then in a newspaper having a general circulation therein, for a period of not less than two (2) successive weeks. The first publication shall be made not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of such public contract, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. The Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to reject any and all bids. If all bids on a tract or parcel of land are rejected, the Department of Finance and Administration may then advertise for new bids on that tract or parcel of land. Successful bidders shall take possession of their leaseholds at such time authorized by the Department of Finance and Administration. Provided, however, rent shall be due no later than the day upon which the lessee shall assume possession of the leasehold, and shall be due on the anniversary date for each following year of the lease. The Department of Finance and Administration shall have the rights and remedies for the security and collection of such rents given by law to landlords. Upon the execution of the leases as authorized by this section, the leased land shall be liable to be taxed as other lands are taxed during the continuance of the lease, but in case of sale thereon for taxes, only the title of the leaseholder or his heirs or assigns shall pass by the sale.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5844-21; Laws, 1962, ch. 181, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 423; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 233; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-13.1.
Department to develop and implement safety program for hiking, horseback riding and walking trails in wildlife management areas during gun season.

The department shall clearly designate and mark hiking, horseback riding and walking trails on state-owned wildlife management areas.The department shall develop and implement a safety program and regulations for the use of the trails during any gun season.

The department is directed to enter into a memorandum of understanding with the USDA Forest Service to develop and implement a safety program and regulations for the use of hiking, horseback riding and walking trails during any gun season in wildlife management areas on national forest lands.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 523, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-5-14.
Fox preserve or refuge; contracts with private landowners in Yalobusha or Grenada counties.

In addition to the powers and duties now conferred upon the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the commission may, in its discretion, establish the land in Yalobusha County or Grenada County necessary and requisite for the construction and maintenance thereon of a fox preserve or refuge. The commission also may enter into contracts with private landowners for the purpose of designating certain portions of land in Yalobusha County and Grenada County as a fox preserve or refuge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 438, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-5-15.
Contracts with counties for joint support and maintenance of projects or refuges.

The commission may contract with any county or counties in which such a game and fish management project or game and fish hunting and fishing refuge may be located or any municipality located in such county, for the joint support and maintenance thereof so that the cost of acquisition, construction and maintenance of such project may be borne jointly by such agencies. The commission may use any revenues from the sale of timber, mineral leases on such land, any donations made to such a project by any agency of the federal government or the State of Mississippi or fees collected for permits granted for hunting and fishing thereon toward financing same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5844-22; Laws, 1962, ch. 181, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-16.
Construction of lodges.

The commission may enter into agreements with counties in which game and fish wildlife management areas are located, and to accept monies from the counties, the federal government, or from any other sources, for the construction and operation of lodges on lands owned by the commission. The lodges shall be controlled and operated by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5844-31; Laws, 1972, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-17.
Issuance and retirement of bonds.

Bonds may be issued by any municipality or county as now authorized by Section 55-9-1 to secure funds to purchase the required lands and to construct game and fish management projects, all of which shall be done under the direction of the commission. Such bonds shall be retired by the proceeds of ad valorem taxes levied by such counties and municipalities, and the commission may pledge to the payment of such bonds any funds accruing to it under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5844-23; Laws, 1962, ch. 181, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-19.
Posting of refuges.

Notices or sign boards not less than one (1) foot square, warning all persons against hunting, trapping, or fishing, or trespassing thereon for that purpose, shall be conspicuously posted by the executive director, or under his direction, close to and along the entire boundary of any refuge, sanctuary, rest ground, lake or stream, or portion thereof, closed to hunting or fishing by order of the commission, in such number as the executive director may deem necessary.

No order of the commission closing any area to hunting, trapping or fishing shall become effective until such order has been published in the manner required by Section 49-1-45 and copy of the order, certified by the secretary of the commission, shall be filed in the office of the sheriff of the county or counties in which such closed area is located.

No person shall take or destroy any animal, bird, or fish, or bird’s nest or egg, or eggs or spawn of fish in any refuge, sanctuary, rest ground, or other area closed to hunting, trapping or fishing by order of the commission, but it shall be lawful for a duly accredited employee of the state or of the federal government to take predatory animals or birds on any such closed area.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5847; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1954, ch. 171; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-21.
Fisheries and Wildlife Fund created; annual budget requests to Legislature.

The department shall transfer all funds under its control into a special fund in the State Treasury to be segregated and known as the “Fisheries and Wildlife Fund,” which fund can only be expended as authorized by the Legislature for the purposes for which the department was created. All funds derived from the sale of licenses, fees, fines and other revenues received by the department as provided by law, shall be deposited in the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund. The interest obtained thereon from any investment or deposit made pursuant to Section 27-105-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be credited by the State Treasurer to the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund and shall not be paid into the General Fund of Mississippi.

The department may expend such sums as are authorized by the Legislature from the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund for paying salaries of its employees, operating and maintaining equipment and for any other purpose the department is authorized to expend funds by law, which amount shall be available for expenditure.

The money herein authorized shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund on warrants issued by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration upon requisition signed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

The department shall prepare and submit annually to the Legislature a budget for its proposed operation. The budget required shall reflect all anticipated revenues from all sources, including all grants and matching funds, together with all proposed expenditures. The budget shall be prepared in the same manner as is now required of other departments of this state. The department shall be subject to budgetary control and audit in the same manner as is provided by law for other departments and agencies. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring legislative appropriation of such Fisheries and Wildlife Fund, but it is intended that expenditure of such funds shall be under authority of the budget approved as herein provided and as authorized by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5862.5; Laws, 1952, ch. 192, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1970, ch. 282, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 475; Laws, 1982, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 234; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 33, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-23.
Federal regulatory authority; cooperative agreements with United States.

Consent is hereby given to the making by the Congress of the United States, or under its authority, of all such rules and regulations as the federal government shall determine to be needful in respect to game animals, game and nongame birds, and fish on such lands in the State of Mississippi as shall have been, or may hereafter be, purchased by the United States under the terms of the act of Congress of March 1, 1911, entitled “An Act to Enable Any State to Cooperate With Any Other State or With the United States for the Protection of the Watersheds of Navigable Streams and to Appoint a Commission for the Acquisition of Lands for the Purpose of Conserving the Navigability of Navigable Rivers,” and acts of Congress supplementary thereto and amendatory thereof, and in or on the waters thereof.

The executive director shall have the right and authority to enter into a cooperative agreement with the United States government, or with the proper authorities thereof, for the protection and management of the wildlife resources of the national forest lands within the State of Mississippi and for the restocking of the same with desirable species of game, birds, and other animals, and fish.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5926; Laws, 1938, ch. 179; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-25.
Wildlife restoration.

The State of Mississippi hereby assents to the provisions of the Pittman-Robertson Wildlife Restoration Act of 1937 (Public Law No. 415, 75th Congress, 1st Session), and the Dingell-Johnson Sport Fish Restoration Act of 1950 (Public Laws 681, 81st Congress), and the commission may perform any acts as may be necessary to ensure the conservation of fish and wildlife. Revenue from hunting and fishing license sales shall be under the exclusive control of the state fish and wildlife agency for the sole use of the administration of the state fish and wildlife agency, which includes only the functions required to manage the agency and the fish and wildlife-related resources for which the agency has authority under state law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5927; Laws, 1938, Ex Sess ch. 39; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 11; Laws, 1956, ch. 154; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 35; Laws, 2012, ch. 419, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2012.).

§ 49-5-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2012, ch. 419, § 2, effective and in force from and after passage (approved April 18, 2012).

§49-5-27. [Codes, 1942, § 5927.3; Laws, 1952, ch. 188, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.)]

§ 49-5-29.
Federal migratory bird refuges.

Consent of the State of Mississippi is hereby given to the acquisition by the United States by purchase, lease or gift of such land in Mississippi as in the opinion of the federal government and the governor of the state may be needed for the establishment of national migratory bird refuges in this region. The state shall retain a concurrent jurisdiction with the United States in and over such lands, reserving to the state in a ceded territory full civil and criminal jurisdiction concurrently with the federal government in all violations of the state and federal laws so that civil process in all cases and such criminal process as may issue under the authority of the state against a person charged with the commission of any crime, without or within such jurisdiction, may be executed thereon in like manner as before the passage of this section. Power is hereby conferred on Congress to pass such laws as it may deem necessary to the acquisition as herein provided for incorporation in said national migratory bird refuges of such forest covered or cutover lands lying in Mississippi as, in the opinion of the federal government, may be needed. The power is hereby conferred upon Congress to pass such laws and to make or provide for the making of such rules of both civil and criminal nature, and providing punishment for violation thereof, as in its judgment may be necessary for the management, control, or protection of such land as may from time to time be acquired by the United States under the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4751; 1942, § 5928.

§ 49-5-31.
Federal acts.

The federal conservation acts for the protection of game and fish and applicable regulations are hereby made a part of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5909; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1998, ch. 345, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-5-33.
Authority of United States Commissioner of fishieries.

The United States Commissioner of Fisheries and his duly authorized agents are hereby accorded the right to carry on fish-cultural activities and all operations connected therewith in any manner and at such times as may by such commissioner, or his agents, be considered necessary and proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5924; Laws, 1932, ch. 322.

§ 49-5-35.
Biological survey.

The department is authorized to cooperate with the United States Bureau of Biological Survey in the taking, killing and destruction of predatory animals within the state that are destructive to game birds, animals and livestock. The department may pay its proportionate share of the salary and expenses of the designated representative of the Bureau of Biological Survey out of any funds to the credit of the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund for the purpose of carrying out this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5925; Laws, 1938, ch. 180; Laws, 1982, ch. 365, § 8; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 37, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-37.
Appropriation to eradicate rabies among foxes.

The sum of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), or so much thereof as may be necessary is hereby appropriated out of any money in the treasury of the department, for the purpose of eradicating rabies among foxes in any county in the State of Mississippi, when the Board of Health or the commission determines that the disease is prevalent in any county or district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5927.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 12; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 38, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-39.
Fines and penalties.

For every violation of Section 49-5-5 the person so offending shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) or more than Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), and by imprisonment in the county jail not less than ten (10) days or more than thirty (30) days. For every subsequent violation of Section 49-5-5, the person so offending shall be punished by a fine of not less than Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) or more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and by imprisonment in the county jail not less than ten (10) days or more than thirty (30) days, which sentence shall be served and not suspended. No person convicted of violating the above section shall for two (2) years thereafter be allowed to hunt or receive license to hunt for birds or game in the county of his conviction and in the management area within which the refuge, sanctuary or preserve is located. No person convicted of any subsequent violation of the above section shall for two (2) years thereafter be allowed to hunt or receive a license to hunt for birds or game in the State of Mississippi.

Any person trespassing on any game or fish refuge in any game or fish management area shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and imprisonment in the county jail of not more than thirty (30) days.

Unless a different or other penalty or punishment is specially prescribed, a person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds or fish, or who fails to perform any duty imposed by such laws or regulations, or who violates or fails to comply with any lawful order, rule or regulation adopted by the commission is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3881; 1942, §§ 5837, 5844-24, 5866; Laws, 1924, ch. 323; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 197; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 4; Laws, 1956, ch. 149, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 181, § 6, ch 187; Laws, 1971, ch. 313, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 470, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1977).

§ 49-5-41.
Statute of limitations.

Section 99-1-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply to all violations of the laws or regulations relating to wild animals, birds, or fish.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5865; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-5-43.
Duties of sheriffs and other peace officers.

Any violation or attempt to violate any of the provisions of this chapter, or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds or fish, shall constitute and is hereby declared a misdemeanor. All sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, constables and peace officers of this state are hereby made ex-officio special conservation officers and it shall be their duty to aid in the enforcement of such laws or regulations.

It shall be the duty of the conservation officer, sheriff, constable and city, town and village officers within the county to arrest, with or without process, any person whom they may know or have good reason to believe is violating the provisions of Section 49-5-5 and shall take them before the proper justice of the peace or other officer to be dealt with according to law. Any private person may arrest any person violating the above section in his presence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3884; 1942, §§ 5840, 5857; Laws, 1924, ch. 323; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 221; Laws, 1974, ch. 569, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1974).

§ 49-5-45.
Duties of district attorneys, county attorneys and circuit judges.

It shall be the duty of each district attorney in this state and county prosecuting attorney in each county to prosecute and defend, for the state, in all courts of the county or counties in his district or county, all causes, criminal or civil, arising under the provisions of this chapter, or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds or fish, in which the state may be a party or may be interested or concerned. Circuit judges shall give the grand juries, when organized, the provisions of the laws relating to wild animals, birds and fish strictly in charge and shall urge strict inquiry into all violations thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5858; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-5-47.
Corporations; how prosecuted.

In case of a violation of this chapter or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds, fish by a corporation the warrant of arrest may be read to and a true copy delivered to the president, secretary, or manager in this state, or to any general or local agent thereof in the county where the action is pending, and, upon the return of such warrant so served, the corporation shall be deemed in court and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, and any fines imposed may be collected by the execution against the property of such corporation, but this section shall not be deemed to exempt any agent or employee from prosecution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5859; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-5-49.
Witnesses.

No person called upon to testify as a witness, by or under authority of any court, in any case brought under this chapter, or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds, or fish shall be excused or exempted from so testifying on the ground that the testimony sought might incriminate him or tend to incriminate him, whether he is called upon to give evidence or produce books, records and papers, but such person shall not thereafter be prosecuted for any offense concerning which he is so called upon to give such testimony or furnish such books, papers, or documents.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5861; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-5-51.
Disposition of fines.

All moneys collected as fines or penalties for violations of the provisions of this chapter, or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds, or fish shall be paid over by the court, justice court judge, or other office collecting or receiving the fines or penalties to the county having jurisdiction over the violations as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3881; 1942, §§ 5837, 5863; Laws, 1924, ch. 323; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 197; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1958, ch. 177; Laws, 1974, ch. 569, § 17; Laws, 1982, ch. 365, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.